Mississippi, session 2026, HB1401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-153-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted as follows: 37-153-1.  This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Comprehensive Workforce Training and Education Consolidation Act of 2004." SECTION 2.  Section 37-153-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted as follows: 37-153-3.  It is the intent of the Legislature by the passage of Chapter 572, Laws of 2004, to establish one (1) comprehensive workforce development system in the State of Mississippi that is focused on achieving results, using resources efficiently and ensuring that workers and employers can easily access needed services.  This system shall reflect a consolidation of the Mississippi Workforce Development Advisory Council and the Mississippi State Workforce Investment Act Board.  The purpose of Chapter 572, Laws of 2004, is to provide workforce activities, through a statewide system that maximizes cooperation among state agencies, that increase the employment, retention and earnings of participants, and increase occupational skill attainment by participants and as a result, improve the quality of the workforce, reduce welfare dependency and enhance the productivity and competitiveness of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 3.  Section 37-153-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted and amended as follows: 37-153-5.  For purposes of this article, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings respectively ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "State board" or "board" means the Mississippi State Workforce Investment Board. (b)  "District councils" means the Local Workforce Development Councils. (c)  "Local workforce investment board" means the board that oversees the workforce development activities of local workforce areas under the federal Workforce * * * Investment Innovation Opportunity Act. (d)  "Office" means the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development, housed at the Department of * * * Finance and Administration Employment Security. SECTION 4.  Section 37-153-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted and amended as follows: 37-153-7.  (1)  There is created the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development and the Mississippi State Workforce Investment Board, which shall serve as the advisory board for the office.  The Mississippi State Workforce Investment Board shall be composed of thirty-one (31) voting members, of which a majority shall be representatives of business and industry in accordance with the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, or any successive acts. (2)  The members of the State Workforce Investment Board shall include: (a)  The Governor, or his designee; (b)  Nineteen (19) members, appointed by the Governor, of whom: (i)  A majority shall be representatives of businesses in the state, who: 1.  Are owners of businesses, chief executives or operating officers of businesses, or other business executives or employers with optimum policymaking or hiring authority, and who, in addition, may be members of a local board described in Section 3122(b)(2)(A)(i) of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.  At least two (2) of the members appointed under this item 1. shall be small business owners, chief executives or operating officers of businesses with less than fifty (50) employees; 2.  Represent businesses, including small businesses, or organizations representing businesses, which provide employment opportunities that, at a minimum, include high-quality, work-relevant training and development in high-demand industry sectors or occupations in the state; and 3.  Are appointed from among individuals nominated by state business organizations and business trade associations; (ii)  Not less than twenty percent (20%) shall consist of representatives of the workforce within the state, which: 1.  Includes labor organization representatives who have been nominated by state labor federations; 2.  Includes a labor organization member or training director from an apprenticeship program in the state, which shall be a joint labor-management apprenticeship program if such a program exists in the state; 3.  May include representatives of community-based organizations, including organizations serving veterans or providing or supporting competitive, integrated employment for individuals with disabilities, who have demonstrated experience and expertise in addressing employment, training or education needs of individuals with barriers to employment; and 4.  May include representatives of organizations, including organizations serving out-of-school youth, who have demonstrated experience or expertise in addressing the employment, training or education needs of eligible youth; (iii)  The balance shall include government representatives, including the lead state officials with primary responsibility for core programs, and chief elected officials (collectively representing both cities and counties, where appropriate); (c)  Two (2) representatives of businesses in the state appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (d)  Two (2) representatives of businesses in the state appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) recommendations from the Speaker of the House; and (e)  The following state officials or their designees: (i)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security; (ii)  The Executive Director of the Department of Rehabilitation Services; (iii)  The State Superintendent of Public Education; (iv)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority; (v)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board; (vi)  The President of the Community College Association; and (vii)  The Commissioner of Higher Education. (f)  One (1) senator, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, and one (1) representative, appointed by the Speaker of the House, shall serve on the state board in a nonvoting capacity. (g)  The Governor may appoint additional members if required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, or any successive acts. (h)  Members of the board shall serve a term of four (4) years, and shall not serve more than three (3) consecutive terms. (i)  The membership of the board shall reflect the diversity of the State of Mississippi. (j)  The Governor shall designate the Chairman of the Mississippi State Workforce Investment Board from among the business and industry voting members of the board, and a quorum of the board shall consist of a majority of the voting members of the board. (k)  The voting members of the board who are not state employees shall be entitled to reimbursement of their reasonable expenses in the manner and amount specified in Section 25-3-41 and shall be entitled to receive per diem compensation as authorized in Section 25-3-69. (3)  Members of the state board may be recalled by their appointing authority for cause, including a felony conviction, fraudulent or dishonest acts or gross abuse of discretion, failure to meet board member qualifications, or chronic failure to attend board meetings. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Employment Security shall establish limits on administrative costs for each portion of Mississippi's workforce development system consistent with the federal Workforce Investment Act or any future federal workforce legislation. (5)  The Mississippi State Workforce Investment Board shall have the following duties, which are intended to be consistent with the scope of duties provided in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, amendments and successor legislation to this act, and other relevant federal law: (a)  Through the office, develop and submit to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House a strategic plan for an integrated state workforce development system that aligns resources and structures the system to more effectively and efficiently meet the demands of Mississippi's employers and job seekers.  This plan will comply with the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, as amended, the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 and amendments and successor legislation to these acts; (b)  Assist the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House in the development and continuous improvement of the statewide workforce investment system that shall include: (i)  Development of linkages in order to assure coordination and nonduplication among programs and activities; and (ii)  Review local workforce development plans that reflect the use of funds from the federal Workforce Investment Act, Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, the Wagner-Peyser Act and the amendment or successor legislation to the acts, and the Mississippi Comprehensive Workforce Training and Education Consolidation Act; (c)  Recommend to the office the designation of local workforce investment areas as required in Section 116 of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 and the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.  There shall be four (4) workforce investment areas that are generally aligned with the planning and development district structure in Mississippi.  Planning and development districts will serve as the fiscal agents to manage Workforce * * * Investment Innovation Opportunity Act funds, oversee and support the local workforce investment boards aligned with the area and the local programs and activities as delivered by the one-stop employment and training system.  The planning and development districts will perform this function through the provisions of the county cooperative service districts created under Sections 19-3-101 through 19-3-115; however, planning and development districts currently performing this function under the Interlocal Cooperation Act of 1974, Sections 17-13-1 through 17-13-17, may continue to do so; (d)  Assist the Governor in the development of an allocation formula for the distribution of funds for adult employment and training activities and youth activities to local workforce investment areas; (e)  Recommend comprehensive, results-oriented measures that shall be applied to all of Mississippi's workforce development system programs; (f)  Assist the Governor in the establishment and management of a one-stop employment and training system conforming to the requirements of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 and the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, as amended, recommending policy for implementing the Governor's approved plan for employment and training activities and services within the state.  In developing this one-stop career operating system, the Mississippi State Workforce Investment Board, in conjunction with local workforce investment boards, shall: (i)  Design broad guidelines for the delivery of workforce development programs; (ii)  Identify all existing delivery agencies and other resources; (iii)  Define appropriate roles of the various agencies to include an analysis of service providers' strengths and weaknesses; (iv)  Determine the best way to utilize the various agencies to deliver services to recipients; and (v)  Develop a financial plan to support the delivery system that shall, at a minimum, include an accountability system; (g)  To provide authority, in accordance with any executive order of the Governor, for developing the necessary collaboration among state agencies at the highest level for accomplishing the purposes of this article; (h)  To monitor the effectiveness of the workforce development centers and WIN job centers; (i)  To advise the Governor, public schools, community and junior colleges and institutions of higher learning on effective school-to-work transition policies and programs that link students moving from high school to higher education and students moving between community colleges and four-year institutions in pursuit of academic and technical skills training; (j)  To work with industry to identify barriers that inhibit the delivery of quality workforce education and the responsiveness of educational institutions to the needs of industry; (k)  To provide periodic assessments on effectiveness and results of the overall Mississippi comprehensive workforce development system and district councils; (l)  Develop broad statewide development goals, including a goal to raise the state's labor force participation rate; (m)  Perform a comprehensive review of Mississippi's workforce development efforts, including the amount spent and effectiveness of programs supported by state or federal money; and (n)  To assist the Governor in carrying out any other responsibility required by the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, as amended and the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, successor legislation and amendments. (6)  The Mississippi State Workforce Investment Board shall coordinate all training programs and funds within its purview, consistent with the federal Workforce Investment Act, Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, amendments and successor legislation to these acts, and other relevant federal law. Each state agency director responsible for workforce training activities shall advise the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development and the State Workforce Investment Board of appropriate federal and state requirements.  Each state agency, department and institution shall report any monies received for workforce training activities or career and technical education and a detailed itemization of how those monies were spent to the state board.  The board shall compile the data and provide a report of the monies and expenditures to the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chair of the House Workforce Development Committee and the Chair of the Senate Economic and Workforce Development Committee by * * * October November 1 of each year.  Each such state agency director shall remain responsible for the actions of his agency; however, each state agency and director shall work cooperatively to fulfill the state's goals. (7)  The State Workforce Investment Board shall establish an executive committee, which shall consist of the following State Workforce Investment Board members: (a)  The Chair of the State Workforce Investment Board; (b)  Two (2) business representatives currently serving on the state board selected by the Governor; (c)  The two (2) business representatives currently serving on the state board appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (d)  The two (2) business representatives currently serving on the state board appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) recommendations from the Speaker of the House; (e)  The two (2) legislators, who shall serve in a nonvoting capacity, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor from the membership of the Mississippi Senate and one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives from the membership of the Mississippi House of Representatives. (8)  The executive committee shall select an executive director of the Office of Workforce Development, with the advice and consent of a majority of the State Workforce Investment Board. The executive committee shall seek input from economic development organizations across the state when selecting the executive director.  The executive director shall: (a)  Be a person with extensive experience in development of economic, human and physical resources, and promotion of industrial and commercial development.  The executive director shall have a bachelor's degree from a state-accredited institution and no less than eight (8) years of professional experience related to workforce or economic development; (b)  Perform the functions necessary for the daily operation and administration of the office, with oversight from the executive committee and the State Workforce Investment Board, to fulfill the duties of the state board as described in Chapter 476, Laws of 2020; (c)  Hire staff needed for the performance of his or her duties under Chapter 476, Laws of 2020.  The executive director, with approval from the executive committee, shall set the compensation of any hired employees from any funds made available for that purpose; (d)  Enter any part of the Mississippi Community College Board, individual community and junior colleges, or other workforce training facilities operated by the state or its subdivisions; (e)  Serve at the will and pleasure of the executive committee; (f)  Promulgate rules and regulations, subject to oversight by the executive committee, not inconsistent with this article, as may be necessary to enforce the provisions in Chapter 476, Laws of 2020; and (g)  Perform any other actions he or she, in consultation with the executive committee, deems necessary to fulfill the duties under Chapter 476, Laws of 2020. (9)  The office shall file an annual and a quarterly report with the Governor, Secretary of State, President of the Senate, Speaker of the House, Chairman of the House Workforce Development Committee and Chairman of the Senate Economic and Workforce Development Committee.  The annual report shall be filed not later than November 1 of each year regarding all funds approved by the office to be expended on workforce training during the prior calendar year.  The quarterly and annual reports shall include: (a)  Information on the performance of the Mississippi Workforce Enhancement Training Fund and the Mississippi Works Fund, in terms of adding value to the local and state economy, the contribution to future growth of the state economy, and movement toward state goals, including increasing the labor force participation rate; (b)  With respect to specific workforce training projects: (i)  The location of the training; (ii)  The amount allocated to the project; (iii)  The purpose of the project; (iv)  The specific business entity that is the beneficiary of the project; (v)  The number of employees intended to be trained and actually trained, if applicable, in the course of the project; and (vi)  The types of funds used for the project; (c)  With respect to the grants that have been awarded under the Mississippi K-12 Workforce Development Grant Program created in Section 37-153-221: (i)  The entity that was awarded the grant; (ii)  The amount allocated to the grant; (iii)  The purpose of the grant; (iv)  How the grant has been used since it was awarded; and (d)  With respect to the office's authority to select tools and resources, including necessary online platforms and similar systems in furtherance of the mission of the office: (i)  The policies that the office has adopted or amended on the process for the selection of tools and resources, including necessary online platforms and similar systems in furtherance of the mission of the office; (ii)  The eligible entities that the office determined may provide services, such as companies, nonprofit organizations, or other similar groups; (iii)  Any tools and resources, including necessary online platforms and similar systems in furtherance of the mission of the office, that have been selected by the office; and (iv)  What entity received the benefit of the tools and resources that were selected. (e)  All information concerning a proposed project which is provided to the executive director shall be kept confidential.  Except as provided in subsections (13) and (14), such confidentiality shall not limit disclosure under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 of records describing the nature, quantity, cost or other pertinent information related to the activities of, or services performed using, the Mississippi Workforce Enhancement Training Fund or the Mississippi Works Fund. (10)  In addition to other powers and duties provided in this section, the Office of Workforce Development shall also have the following powers and duties: (a)  Direct access to accounting and banking statements for all funds under its direction to ensure accurate and efficient management of funds and to improve internal control; (b)  The ability to enter into nondisclosure agreements to effectively support economic development activities and the proprietary nature of customized training for existing and new industry; (c)  To adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable for the purpose of implementing the Mississippi K-12 Workforce Development Grant Program created in Section 37-153-221; (d)  To receive contributions, donations, gifts, bequests of money, other forms of financial assistance and property, equipment, materials or manpower from persons, foundations, trust funds, corporations, organizations and other sources, public or private, made to the office, and may expend or use the same in accordance with the conditions prescribed by the donor, provided that no such condition is contrary to any provision of law; (e)  To contract with state agencies, governing authorities or economic and workforce development entities for shared programmatic efforts and support service or joint employment of personnel in order to further the office's purposes; (f)  To determine, subject to appropriation, the need for and, if desired, the selection of tools and resources, including necessary online platforms and similar systems in furtherance of the mission of the office, through processes established in policies adopted by the office that are deemed to be practical, feasible and in the public interest.  These processes shall outline eligible entities that may provide such services, such as companies, nonprofit organizations, or other similar groups and shall ensure the office determines metrics for success, including deliverables as required by the office; (g)  To implement the career coaching program provided for in Section 37-73-3; (h)  To provide career coaches with access to technology to develop customized career pathways and connect students with postsecondary and employment opportunities matching their skills and interests; and (i)  To implement and oversee programs providing support to community and junior colleges for training needs that may arise when new businesses locate in Mississippi, to include providing support to existing industries that may lose employees as a result of the new business. Through December 31, * * * 2026 2028, the provisions of Section 27-104-7 related to rental agreements * * * or, the leasing of real property, or the purchase of personal or professional services for the purpose of conducting agency business shall not apply to the office. (11)  Nothing in Chapter 476, Laws of 2020 [Senate Bill No. 2564] shall void or otherwise interrupt any contract, lease, grant or other agreement previously entered into by the State Workforce Investment Board, Mississippi Community College Board, individual community or junior colleges, or other entities. (12)  Any records of the office which contain client information from the Mississippi Development Authority or local economic development entities concerning development projects shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 for a period of two (2) years after receipt of the information by the office.  Confidential client information as described in this section shall not include the information which must be disclosed by the certified applicant related to a qualified economic development project in the annual report described in Section 57-1-759. (13)  Confidential client information in public records held by the office shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 during any period of review and negotiation on a project proposal facilitated by the Mississippi Development Authority or local economic development entities and for a period of thirty (30) days after approval, disapproval or abandonment of the proposal not to exceed one (1) year. SECTION 5.  Section 37-153-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted and amended as follows: 37-153-15.  (1)  As used in this article: (a)  The words "industry certification" mean a process through which students are assessed by an independent, third-party certifying entity using predetermined standards for knowledge, skills and competencies, resulting in the award of a credential that is nationally recognized and must be at least one (1) of the following: (i)  Within an industry that addresses a critical local, regional or statewide economic need; (ii)  Linked to an occupation that is included in the * * * State Department of Employment Security's occupations in high‑demand list Office of Workforce Development's Priority Occupation List or identified by the State Workforce Investment Board; or (iii)  Linked to an occupation that is identified as emerging. (b)  The words "qualifying industry certification" mean an industry certification that is linked to an occupation with wages of at least seventy percent (70%) of the median state income unless the industry certification is stackable to another postsecondary or professional credential which is linked to an occupation which meets the wage criterion. (2)  The State Workforce Investment Board shall provide the State Board of Education annually with a list of qualifying industry certifications.  If the occupations identified in the list are not substantially the same as those occupations identified in the prior year, the State Board of Education shall provide reasonable notice of the changes to school districts. (3)  Beginning in fiscal year 2019-2020 and subject to available funding, the Department of Education shall pay a career and technical education incentive grant to the public school for each student enrolled in the public school who earns a qualifying industry certification.  The amount per student for the career and technical education incentive grant shall be Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00).  If the statewide sum of the career and technical education incentive grants awarded pursuant to this section exceeds the amount of available funds appropriated for the grants, the grants per student shall be reduced proportionately to cover all eligible grants under this section.  Any costs accrued during one (1) fiscal year may be claimed and reimbursed in the following fiscal year. (4)  The grants may be used for qualifying industry certification examination fees, professional development for teachers in career and technical education programs under this section, student instructional support for programs that lead to qualifying industry certifications, * * * or to increase access to qualifying industry certifications, or to purchase equipment necessary for programs that lead to qualifying industry certifications.  Any grants awarded under this section may not be used to supplant funds provided for the basic operation of the career and technical education programs. (5)  On or before * * * October November 1 of each year, the Department of Education, working in collaboration with the Office of Workforce Development and any other entities as necessary, shall submit a report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairmen of the House and Senate Education Committees, the Chairman of the House Workforce Development Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Economic and Workforce Development Committee on the following: (a)  The number of students who enrolled in a career and technical education course or program that leads to a qualifying industry certification. (b)  The number of students who earned a qualifying industry certification by certification. (c)  The amount of career and technical education incentive grants awarded by the school. (d)  The amount of career and technical education incentive grants awarded per student. (e)  Aggregated demographic data on the students who earned a qualifying industry certification, including the qualifying industry certifications earned by rural and urban students. SECTION 6.  Section 37-153-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-153-17.  Sections 37-153-1, 37-153-3, 37-153-5, 37-153-7 and 37-153-15 shall stand repealed on July 1, * * *2026 2029. SECTION 7.  Section 37-153-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, which requires the establishment of a local workforce investment board in each of the four (4) workforce areas of the state, is repealed. SECTION 8.  Sections 37-153-11 and 37-153-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, which require the establishment of One-Stop Career Centers affiliated with the community and junior colleges and designates the Mississippi Community College Board as the primary support agency to the workforce development centers, are repealed. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.